District of Columbia statutes.
50-408

Fees.

The Mayor shall set and collect fees to help pay the cost for implementation of the uniform classification and commercial driver’s license program set forth in § 50-402. The money generated from the fees shall be placed in the General Fund of the District of Columbia and used to offset the cost of the uniform classification and commercial driver’s license program.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-161, § 9, 37 DCR 4665
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9105, 58 DCR 6226

History

1981 Ed., § 40-1808.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 19-21 substituted “the General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “a designated account”.

Effect of Amendments